West Virginia, session 2025, HB2964.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 29. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS — REGIONAL AIRPORTS. §8-29-6. Qualification of members. To be qualified to serve, members of the board of each authority shall be drawn from residents of the municipality(ies) and/or contiguous county(ies) which created and established the regional airport authority. The municipality or county is each authorized to make their regional airport authority board appointments from within either government entity’s boundaries. Such regional airport authority board membership may be composed of any combination of such qualified municipal and county residents, with number of votes of each municipality and county to remain subject to the requirements of §8-29-4 of this code.  The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home